Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2472
Powers of personal representatives; in general.

Until termination of his appointment a personal representative has the same power over the title to property of the estate that an absolute owner would have, in trust however, for the benefit of the creditors and others interested in the estate. Unless otherwise specifically ordered by the court, this power may be exercised without notice, hearing, or order of court.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 150, UPC § 3-711.